North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 15 North Carolina National Guard Tuition Assistance Act of 1975.

§ 127A-190.
Short title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina National Guard Tuition Assistance Act of 1975.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 2; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b); recodified from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 116-209.50 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b), (c).

§ 127A-191.
Purpose.

The General Assembly of North Carolina, recognizing that the North Carolina National Guard is the only organized, trained and equipped military force subject to the control of the State, hereby establishes a program of tuition assistance for qualifying guard members for the purpose of encouraging voluntary membership in the North Carolina National Guard, improving the educational level of its members, and thereby benefiting the State as a whole.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 3; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b); 2011-183, s. 85; recodified from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 116-209.51 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b), (c).

§ 127A-192.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Academic year. — The annual enrollment period used by the Secretary.

Private educational institutions. — Any junior college, senior college or university which is operated and governed by private interests not under the control of the federal, State or any local government, which is located within and licensed by the State of North Carolina, which does not operate for profit, whose curriculum is primarily directed toward the awarding of associate, baccalaureate or graduate degrees, which agrees to the applicable administration and funding provisions of this Article.

Proprietary school. — An educational institution that is (i) defined as a proprietary school in G.S. 115D-87(2), (ii) licensed by the State Board of Community Colleges, or (iii) listed by the North Carolina State Approving Agency for Veterans and Military Education as an approved proprietary school for purposes of this Article.

Secretary. — The Secretary of Public Safety or the Secretary’s designee.

State educational institutions. — Any of the constituent institutions of the University of North Carolina, or any community college operated under the provisions of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

Student loan. — A loan or loans made to eligible students or parents of students to aid in attaining an education beyond the high school level.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 4; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; c. 228, s. 1; 1987, c. 564, s. 24; 2008-94, s. 2; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); 2015-264, s. 66(a); recodified from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 116-209.52 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b), (c).

§ 127A-193.
Benefit.

The benefit provided under this Article shall consist of a monetary educational assistance grant not to exceed the highest amount charged by a State educational institution per academic year or a lesser amount, as prescribed by the Secretary, to remain within the funds appropriated, to qualifying members of the North Carolina National Guard. Benefits provided under G.S. 127A-195(g) shall be payable for a period of one year at a time, renewable at the option of the Secretary. All other benefits provided under this Article shall be payable for a period of one academic year at a time, renewable at the option of the Secretary.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 5; 1977, c. 228, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 99, 100; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 22.3; 2000-67, s. 18; 2005-444, s. 1; 2008-94, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); recodified from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 116-209.53 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b), (c).

§ 127A-194.
Eligibility.

Active members of the North Carolina National Guard who are enrolled or who shall enroll in any proprietary school, private educational institution, or State educational institution shall be eligible to apply for this tuition assistance benefit: Provided, that the applicant has a minimum obligation of two years remaining as a member of the North Carolina National Guard from the end of the academic period for which tuition assistance is provided or that the applicant commit himself or herself to extended membership for at least two additional years from the end of that academic period.

This tuition assistance benefit shall be applicable to students in the following categories:

Students seeking to achieve completion of their secondary school education at a community college or technical institute.

Students seeking trade or vocational training or education.

Students seeking to achieve a two-year associate degree.

Students seeking to achieve a four-year baccalaureate degree.

Students seeking to achieve a graduate degree.

Students enrolled in a program granting a graduate certificate.

Students enrolled in a professional certification program recommended by the Director of the North Carolina National Guard Education and Employment Center and approved by the North Carolina National Guard Education Services Officer.

The following persons shall be eligible to apply for disbursements to pay outstanding student loans pursuant to G.S. 127A-195(g):

Persons described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

Active members of the North Carolina National Guard who were previously enrolled in any proprietary school, private educational institution, or State educational institution, but only if:

The applicant has a minimum obligation of two years remaining as a member of the North Carolina National Guard from the time of the application; or

The applicant commits himself or herself to extended membership for at least two additional years from the time of the application.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 6; 1977, c. 228, ss. 3, 4; 2008-94, s. 4; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); 2011-183, s. 86(a), (b); 2015-264, s. 66(b); 2015-298, s. 1; 2017-155, s. 3; recodified from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 116-209.54 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b), (c).

§ 127A-195.
Administration and funding.

The Secretary is charged with the administration of the tuition assistance program under this Article. The Secretary may delegate administrative tasks to other persons within the Department of Public Safety as the Secretary deems best for the orderly administration of this program. The Department of Public Safety may also contract with the State Education Assistance Authority for the administration of these tuition benefit disbursements.

The Secretary shall determine the eligibility of applicants, select the benefit recipients, establish the effective date of the benefit, and may suspend or revoke the benefit if the Secretary finds that the recipient does not maintain an adequate academic status, or if the recipient engages in riots, unlawful demonstrations, the seizure of educational buildings, or otherwise engages in disorderly conduct, breaches of the peace, or unlawful assemblies. The Secretary shall maintain such records and shall promulgate such rules and regulations as the Secretary deems necessary for the orderly administration of this program. The Secretary may require of proprietary schools or State or private educational institutions such reports and other information as the Secretary may need to carry out the provisions of this Article and the Secretary shall disburse benefit payments for recipients upon certification of enrollment by the enrolling institutions.

All tuition benefit disbursements shall be made to the proprietary school or State or private educational institution concerned, for credit to the tuition account of each recipient. Funds disbursed pursuant to subsection (g) of this section shall be made to the student loan creditor concerned to be applied against the outstanding student loans of each North Carolina National Guard member beneficiary.

The participation by any proprietary school or private educational institution in this program shall be subject to the applicable provisions of this Article and to examination by the State Auditor of the accounts of the benefit recipients attending or having attended such private schools or institutions. The Secretary may defer making an award or may suspend an award in any proprietary school or private educational institution which does not comply with the provisions of this Article relating to said institutions. The manner of payment to any proprietary school or private educational institution shall be as prescribed by the Secretary.

Irrespective of other provisions of this Article, the Secretary may prescribe special procedures for adjusting the accounts of benefit recipients who, for reasons of illness, physical inability to attend classes or for other valid reason satisfactory to the Secretary, may withdraw from any proprietary school or State or private educational institution prior to the completion of the term, semester, quarter or other academic period being attended at the time of withdrawal.

Any balance of the monetary educational assistance grant up to the maximum for the academic year remaining after tuition is paid pursuant to subsection (c) of this section may be disbursed to the recipient as reimbursement for required course books and materials. The manner of obtaining the reimbursement payment for these required books and materials shall be as prescribed by the Secretary.

Any funds not needed to accomplish the other purposes of this Article may be used to help members of the North Carolina National Guard repay outstanding student loans in accordance with rules to be adopted by the Secretary. These rules shall provide that the length of a member’s deployment may be considered in determining whether or not, and in what amount, a member receives assistance pursuant to this subsection. There shall be no reimbursement under this subsection for payments already made on student loans, and funds shall not be provided under this subsection for the purpose of paying student loans obtained for courses from which the member withdrew or for which the member did not receive a passing grade. Payments for outstanding loans shall not exceed the maximum benefit available under

G.S. 127A-193

.

History.

1975, c. 917, s. 7; 1977, c. 70, s. 2; 2005-444, ss. 2, 3; 2008-94, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b), (c); 2011-183, s. 87; 2015-264, s. 66(c); recodified from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 116-209.55 by 2021-180, s. 19E.1(b), (c).